Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-1483.03
Lobbyist or principal; special report required; when; late filing fee.

(1) Any lobbyist or principal who receives or expends more than five thousand dollars for lobbying purposes during any calendar month in which the Legislature is in session shall, within fifteen days after the end of such calendar month, file electronically a special report disclosing for that calendar month all information required by section 49-1483. All information disclosed in a special report shall also be disclosed in the next quarterly report required to be filed. The requirement to file a special report shall not apply to a receipt or expenditure for lobbyist fees for lobbying services which have otherwise been disclosed in the lobbyist's application for registration.

(2) Any lobbyist or principal who fails to file a special report required by this section with the Clerk of the Legislature or the commission shall pay to the commission a late filing fee of two hundred dollars for each of the first ten days the report remains not filed in violation of this section. After the tenth day, such lobbyist or principal shall pay, for each day the report remains not filed, an additional late filing fee of one percent of the amount of the receipts and expenditures which were required to be reported, not to exceed ten percent of the amount of the receipts and expenditures which were required to be reported.

Laws 1994, LB 872, § 5;

Laws 1994, LB 1243, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 1263, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 416, § 17;

Laws 2007, LB434, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 71;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 63.
July 18, 2026